Alabama, session 2026rs, SB22.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
14 Section 1. Sections 9-18A-2, 17-2-2, 17-7-22, 22-3A-3,
15 22-3A-6, 22-57-4, 25-15-3, 29-2-2, 29-2-40, 29-2-272,
16 31-9A-15, 32-3-1, 32-6-67, 36-21-1, 38-3-1, 41-9-370,
17 41-9-371, 41-9-1060, 41-15B-4, 41-18-1, 41-20-4, 41-28-6, and
18 44-1-51, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
19 "§9-18A-2
20 (a) The Governor shall serve as one member of the
21 Southern States Energy Board or may appoint another person to
22 serve as his or her representative. Either the Governor or the
23 person appointed by the Governor may designate another person
24 as a deputy or assistant to such that member.
25 (b) The President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall
26 appoint one member of the Southern States Energy Board from
27 among the membership of the Senate. The president President
28 Pro Tempore of the Senate or the member may designate another
Page 1

Pro Tempore of the Senate or the member may designate another
SB22 Enrolled
29 person as a deputy or assistant to such that member.
30 (c) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall
31 appoint one member of the Southern States Energy Board from
32 among the membership of the House of Representatives. The
33 speaker Speaker of the House of Representatives or the member
34 may designate another person as a deputy or assistant to such
35 that member.
36 (d) Pursuant to Article II of the compact, members
37 shall serve at the pleasure of their appointive authority for
38 a term of four years. If any such member be is the head of a
39 department or agency of this state, he or she may designate a
40 subordinate officer or employee of his or her department or
41 agency to serve in his or her stead as permitted by Article
42 II(a) of the compact and in conformity with any applicable
43 bylaws of the board."
44 "§17-2-2
45 (a) There is established, pursuant to Section 254 of
46 the Help America Vote Act of 2002, a state plan to provide for
47 the implementation of that act. There shall be appointed a
48 committee of 23 individuals to assist the Secretary of State
49 in the development of the state plan. The committee membership
50 shall be inclusive and reflect the racial, gender, geographic,
51 urban, rural, and economic diversity of the state.
52 (b) In accordance with the provisions of Section 255 of
53 the Help America Vote Act of 2002, the members of the
54 committee shall include the following:
55 (1) The judge of probate of the most populous county in
56 the state, according to the most recent federal decennial
Page 2

the state, according to the most recent federal decennial
SB22 Enrolled
57 census.
58 (2) The judge of probate of the second most populous
59 county in the state according to the most recent federal
60 decennial census.
61 (3) Three additional election officials, serving in a
62 county or municipality in the state, to be appointed by the
63 Secretary of State, one of whom shall be recommended by the
64 Probate Judges' Association, one of whom shall be recommended
65 by the Sheriffs' Association, and one of whom shall be
66 recommended by the Circuit Clerks' Association.
67 (4) Five individuals in the state, representing the
68 interests of the electorate to be appointed by the Secretary
69 of State, one of whom shall represent the political party with
70 the highest number of votes in the last presidential election
71 in the state, recommended by the chair of the party, one of
72 whom shall represent the political party with the second
73 highest number of votes in the last presidential election in
74 the state, recommended by the chair of the party, and one of
75 whom shall represent an organization serving as an advocate
76 for the rights of individuals with disabilities.
77 (5) Three private citizens, representing the public at
78 large at-large, to be appointed by the Governor.
79 (6) Five members of the state House of Representatives
80 to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives
81 and two five members of the state Senate to be appointed by
82 the President of the Senate and three members of the state
83 Senate to be appointed by the President Pro Tem Tempore of the
84 Senate.
Page 3

Senate.
SB22 Enrolled
85 (c) Members of the committee shall be appointed within
86 14 days after June 19, 2003, and shall hold their initial
87 organizational meeting within 30 days after June 19, 2003. The
88 committee shall elect a chair from among its members. The
89 members of the committee shall serve without compensation but
90 shall be eligible for reimbursement for necessary and
91 reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of their
92 official duties.
93 (d) The members appointed by the Secretary of State to
94 serve on the first state plan committee will serve until the
95 next gubernatorial inauguration in January of 2007.
96 Thereafter, each member appointed by the Secretary of State
97 shall serve for a term of four years, with each term starting
98 and ending on the date of the state gubernatorial
99 inauguration. A vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as
100 the original appointment.
101 (e) The committee shall have the power and the duty to
102 advise the Secretary of State on the further development of
103 the state plan, which the Secretary of State must develop and
104 submit to the Election Assistance Commission in accordance
105 with the Help America Vote Act of 2002. The committee shall
106 make recommendations on all aspects of the state plan
107 described in Section 254 of the Help America Vote Act of 2002.
108 (f) Twelve members of the committee shall constitute a
109 quorum. A vote of a majority of the members of the board is
110 required for the issuance of recommendations in accordance
111 with subsection (e). The committee shall meet as needed to
112 fulfill the requirements of this section."
Page 4

fulfill the requirements of this section."
SB22 Enrolled
113 "§17-7-22
114 There is hereby created the Alabama Electronic Voting
115 Committee which shall consist of five members. The committee
116 shall consist of a representative appointed by the Secretary
117 of State, a representative appointed by the Attorney General,
118 and one judge of probate who shall be recommended by the
119 Alabama Probate Judges Association and appointed by the Chief
120 Justice of the Supreme Court and shall serve without pay or
121 reimbursement for expenses. Additionally, one member from the
122 House of Representatives and one member from the Senate, to be
123 appointed by the presiding officer of each house Speaker of
124 the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of
125 the Senate who shall be entitled to his or her regular
126 legislative compensation, his or her per diem and travel
127 expenses for each day he or she attends a meeting of the
128 committee which shall be paid out of any funds appropriated to
129 the use of the Legislature, upon warrants drawn on the state
130 Comptroller upon requisitions signed by the committee's
131 chair;, provided, however, that members shall not receive
132 additional legislative compensation or per diem when the
133 Legislature is in session or if a member is being paid any
134 other payments on the same dates for attendance of other state
135 business. The judge of probate shall be chair. The committee
136 shall meet at the call of the chair or any three members."
137 "§22-3A-3
138 The State Health Officer, the Governor or his or her
139 designee, the Director of Finance of the state, the State
140 Treasurer, one member of the state Senate to be appointed by
Page 5

Treasurer, one member of the state Senate to be appointed by
SB22 Enrolled
141 the President Pro Tempore of the Senate (, which member may be
142 the President Pro Tempore of the Senate), and one member of
143 the House of Representatives to be appointed by the Speaker of
144 the House of Representatives (, which member may be the
145 Speaker of the House of Representatives), may become a public
146 corporation with the powers hereinafter provided by proceeding
147 according to the provisions of Section 22-3A-4."
148 "§22-3A-6
149 (a) The applicants named in the application and their
150 respective successors in office shall constitute the members
151 of the authority. The State Health Officer shall be the
152 president of the authority, the Governor or his or her
153 designee shall serve as vice-president vice president of the
154 authority, the Director of Finance of the state shall serve as
155 secretary of the authority, and the State Treasurer shall be
156 the treasurer of the authority. The State Treasurer shall act
157 as custodian of the funds of the authority and shall pay the
158 principal of and the interest and premium (,if any), on the
159 bonds of the authority out of the funds hereinafter provided
160 for. The State Treasurer shall act as paying agent with
161 respect to any series of bonds issued under this chapter.
162 (b) The service of each of the Governor, the State
163 Health Officer, the Director of Finance, and the State
164 Treasurer as a member of the authority and as an officer
165 thereof shall begin and end concurrently with the beginning
166 and end of his or her tenure in such office. Should any of the
167 Governor, the State Health Officer, the Director of Finance,
168 or the State Treasurer cease to hold office by reason of
Page 6

or the State Treasurer cease to hold office by reason of
SB22 Enrolled
169 death, resignation, expiration of his or her term of office,
170 or for any other reason, then his or her successor in office
171 shall take his or her place as a member and officer of the
172 authority.
173 (c) The member of the authority representing the Senate
174 and the member of the authority representing the House of
175 Representatives shall each serve a term as a member of the
176 authority commencing with his or her appointment by the
177 president President Pro Tempore of the Senate or the Speaker
178 of the House of Representatives, as the case may be, and
179 ending with the legislative term during which he or she was
180 appointed;, provided that each of such the members shall
181 continue to serve as a member of the authority beyond his or
182 her legislative term, even though he or she may not have been
183 reelected to the house of the Legislature from which he or she
184 was originally appointed, until a successor shall be appointed
185 by the president President Pro Tempore of the Senate or the
186 Speaker of the House of Representatives, as the case may be. A
187 member of the authority who previously represented either the
188 Senate or the House of Representatives shall be eligible for
189 reappointment as a member of the authority, without limit as
190 to number of successive terms, if at the time of any such
191 reappointment, he or she is a member of the house of the
192 Legislature which he or she is to represent. Should any
193 appointed member of the authority resign from the authority,
194 or cease for any reason to hold office as a member of the
195 house of the Legislature from which he or she was originally
196 appointed, a successor member shall be appointed for the
Page 7

appointed, a successor member shall be appointed for the
SB22 Enrolled
197 unexpired term of such the member, or for a new term if the
198 term of such the member had expired, by the same officer of
199 the Legislature who originally appointed such the member.
200 (d) The members of the authority shall constitute all
201 the members of the board of directors of the authority, and
202 the presence of any four members of the directors shall
203 constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. No
204 member, officer, or director of the authority shall draw any
205 compensation in addition to that now authorized for any
206 service he or she may render or for any duty he or she may
207 perform in connection with the authority. All proceedings had
208 and done by the board of directors shall be reduced to writing
209 by the secretary of the authority, shall be signed by each of
210 the directors, and shall be recorded in a substantially bound
211 book which shall be kept in the office of the Director of
212 Finance. When certified by the secretary of the authority,
213 copies of such the proceedings shall be received in all courts
214 as prima facie evidence of the matters and things therein
215 certified. The board of directors of the authority shall meet
216 at the call of the president of the authority upon five days'
217 written notice to each of the members.
218 (e) If the Governor designates someone other than
219 himself or herself to serve as a member of the authority, the
220 term of said the designee, who shall serve at the pleasure of
221 the Governor, shall commence with his or her appointment by
222 the Governor. A successor designee may be appointed within 30
223 days after the new term of the Governor or his or her
224 successor in office shall commence."
Page 8

successor in office shall commence."
SB22 Enrolled
225 "§22-57-4
226 (a) The composition of the council shall reflect the
227 racial, gender, geographic, urban and, rural, and economic
228 diversity of the state and shall include all of the following:
229 (1) Three adult individuals with ASD, appointed by the
230 Governor.
231 (2) Three individuals who are the parent or guardian of
232 a child with ASD, appointed by the Governor.
233 (3) Five individuals who are service providers,
234 appointed by the Governor.
235 (4) One member of the Senate, appointed by the
236 President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
237 (5) One member of the House of Representatives,
238 appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
239 (6) The chief executive officer, or his or her
240 designee, of each of the following participating agencies:
241 a. The Alabama Department of Early Childhood Education.
242 b. The Alabama Institute for Deaf and Blind.
243 c. The Alabama State Department of Education.
244 d. The Alabama State Department of Human Resources.
245 e. The Alabama Department of Insurance.
246 f. The Alabama Department of Mental Health.
247 g. The Alabama Department State Committee of Public
248 Health.
249 h. The Alabama Department of Rehabilitation Services.
250 i. The Alabama Medicaid Agency.
251 j. The University of Alabama at Birmingham Center of
252 for Excellence in Developmental Disabilities Education,
Page 9

for Excellence in Developmental Disabilities Education,
SB22 Enrolled
253 Research, and Service.
254 k. The Autism Society of Alabama.
255 l. The Alabama Council on Developmental Disabilities.
256 m. The Alabama Academy of Pediatrics.
257 (b) The chief executive officers of state agencies
258 serving on the council shall serve ex officio.
259 (c) Initial terms of appointed members of the council
260 shall be staggered. Subsequent terms shall be for three years.
261 (d) The council shall meet at least quarterly and the
262 meetings shall be open to the public.
263 (e) No member of the council shall cast a vote on any
264 matter which would provide direct financial benefit to that
265 member or otherwise give the appearance of a conflict of
266 interest under state law.
267 (f) The Governor shall appoint the chair of the council
268 from among the membership.
269 (g) The Governor shall designate the lead agency for
270 the council upon recommendation of the council."
271 "§25-15-3
272 (a) The Alabama Workforce Board shall consist of no
273 more than 40 members, or their designees, and meet the
274 membership criteria established by WIOA. All members, unless
275 otherwise provided in this subsection, shall be appointed by
276 the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate. A
277 majority of members shall be representatives of business and
278 industry, at least one of which shall represent small
279 business. Twenty percent of the members shall be
280 representatives of workforce, including two labor
Page 10

representatives of workforce, including two labor
SB22 Enrolled
281 representatives and one apprenticeship program representative.
282 The board shall also include one representative of the WIOA
283 Title I-b programs; the State Adult Education Director; one
284 representative of the Wagner-Peyser Program; the Commissioner
285 of the Alabama Department of Rehabilitation Services; the
286 Chancellor of the Alabama Community College System; the
287 Secretary of Workforce; one member of the Alabama Senate
288 appointed by the presiding officer President Pro Tempore of
289 the Senate; one member of the Alabama House of Representatives
290 appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; one
291 county commissioner appointed by the Governor; one mayor
292 appointed by the Governor; and the Governor or his or her
293 designee. The overall membership of the board shall be
294 inclusive and reflect the racial, gender, geographic, urban/,
295 rural, and economic diversity of the state.
296 (b) The Governor shall appoint a chair from the
297 business representatives on the board as set forth in WIOA. In
298 addition, the Governor shall appoint a vice chair from the
299 business representatives on the board.
300 (c) The Governor shall establish bylaws governing the
301 membership and activities of the board as required by WIOA and
302 its implementing regulations, including 20 C.F.R. §
303 679.110(d).
304 (d) Members may serve no more than two four-year terms
305 as provided in the bylaws established pursuant to subsection
306 (c).
307 "§29-2-2
308 (a) There is created a continuing permanent joint
Page 11

(a) There is created a continuing permanent joint
SB22 Enrolled
309 transportation committee of the Legislature to be known as the
310 Joint Transportation Committee. The committee shall consist of
311 13 members of the Senate appointed by the President Pro
312 Tempore of the Senate and 13 members of the House of
313 Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of
314 Representatives, one senator and one house member to be a
315 resident of each present United States congressional district
316 in the state, one senator and one house member to be a
317 resident of each Alabama State Department of Transportation
318 region, and one senator and one house member who shall be from
319 the minority party to serve at large at-large.
320 (b) The members that reside in the Alabama State
321 Department of Transportation regions of the Joint
322 Transportation Committee shall be appointed by April 11, 2019;
323 in subsequent years, members of the Joint Transportation
324 Committee shall be appointed within five legislative days
325 after the convening of the first regular session after the
326 election of each Legislature. Members shall hold office during
327 their terms as legislators and until their successors are
328 appointed. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment by the
329 respective presiding officer. Appointments shall be made in
330 compliance with the residency requirements established by this
331 article.
332 (c) The appointing authorities shall coordinate their
333 appointments to assure the committee membership is inclusive
334 and reflects the racial, gender, geographic, urban, rural, and
335 economic diversity of the state."
336 "§29-2-40
Page 12

"§29-2-40
SB22 Enrolled
337 (a) There is created the Contract Review Permanent
338 Legislative Oversight Committee. The committee shall be
339 composed of the Chairs of the Senate Finance and Taxation
340 General Fund Committee and the Senate Finance and Taxation
341 Education Committee and the Chairs of the House Ways and Means
342 General Fund Committee and the House Ways and Means Education
343 Committee, and four additional members of the Senate, to be
344 appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and four
345 additional members of the House, to be appointed by the
346 Speaker of the House of Representatives.
347 (b) A member of the committee may serve on the
348 committee as long as the member retains the office that
349 qualified the member for service or during the term to which
350 the member was appointed and, if reelected to the same house
351 without a break in service to that house, during the
352 succeeding legislative term until a successor is appointed as
353 provided in subsection (a)."
354 "§29-2-272
355 (a) The committee shall be composed of the following
356 members:
357 (1) The Chair of the House Committee on Agriculture and
358 Forestry.
359 (2) The Chair of the House Committee on Transportation,
360 Utilities, and Infrastructure.
361 (3) The Chair of the Senate Committee on Agriculture,
362 Conservation, and Forestry.
363 (4) The Chair of the Senate Committee on Transportation
364 and Energy.
Page 13

and Energy.
SB22 Enrolled
365 (5) The Chair of the Permanent Oil and Gas Study
366 Committee.
367 (6) Four members of the House of Representatives
368 appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives,
369 three of whom shall be appointees from the House of
370 Representatives to the Energy Council and one of whom shall be
371 a member of the minority party.
372 (7) Two members of the Senate appointed by the
373 Presiding Officer, both of whom shall be appointees from the
374 Senate to the Energy Council and one of whom shall be a member
375 of the minority party.
376 (8) Two Four members of the Senate appointed by the
377 President Pro Tempore of the Senate, both all of whom shall be
378 appointees from the Senate to the Energy Council and one of
379 whom shall be a member of the minority party.
380 (b) To the extent possible, members of the committee
381 shall reflect the racial, ethnic, gender, geographic, urban/,
382 rural, and economic diversity of the state.
383 (c) The committee shall meet at the call of the chair
384 or a majority of the members thereof, provided that the
385 committee shall meet at least once every six months.
386 (d) The committee may meet, act, and conduct its
387 business at any place within this state during the sessions of
388 the Legislature, or any recess thereof, and in the interim
389 period between sessions.
390 (e) Members of the committee may participate in a
391 meeting of the committee, or any advisory subcommittee of the
392 committee, by means of telephone conference, video conference,
Page 14

committee, by means of telephone conference, video conference,
SB22 Enrolled
393 or similar communications equipment by means of which all
394 persons participating in the meeting may hear each other at
395 the same time. Participation by such means shall constitute
396 presence in person at a meeting for all purposes. However, a
397 majority of a quorum of the members of the committee or
398 advisory subcommittee shall be physically present at the
399 location noticed and called for the meeting in order to
400 conduct any business or deliberation. Members of the committee
401 and any advisory subcommittees of the committee may not
402 utilize electronic communications except as in compliance with
403 the Alabama Open Meetings Act. Except for emergency meetings,
404 notice of committee meetings shall be provided in accordance
405 with the Alabama Open Meetings Act, and telephone or video
406 conference or similar communications equipment shall also
407 allow members of the public the opportunity to simultaneously
408 listen to or observe such meetings.
409 (f) Terms of service on the committee shall coincide
410 with the elected terms of the serving members.
411 (g) Commencing with the first meeting of the committee
412 called after June 1, 2018, and each two years thereafter, the
413 committee shall elect from among its members a chair and a
414 vice chair."
415 "§31-9A-15
416 (a) The Joint Legislative Committee on Homeland
417 Security Oversight is created. The committee shall be composed
418 of three members of the Senate, one appointed by the President
419 of the Senate, one two appointed by the President Pro Tempore
420 of the Senate, and one appointed by the Senate Committee on
Page 15

of the Senate, and one appointed by the Senate Committee on
SB22 Enrolled
421 Assignments; and three members of the House of Representatives
422 appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives. Each
423 member shall serve a term on the committee concurrent with the
424 legislative term of the member. Vacancies shall be filled by
425 the original appointing authority. Members shall serve at the
426 pleasure of the appointing authority.
427 (b) Each member of the committee shall be entitled to
428 regular legislative compensation, per diem, and travel
429 expenses for each day he or she attends a meeting of the
430 committee, which shall be paid out of the funds appropriated
431 to the use of the Legislature, on warrants drawn on the state
432 Comptroller upon requisition signed by the committee's chair.
433 Members shall not receive additional compensation or per diem
434 when the Legislature is in session.
435 (c) The committee shall review the operations of the
436 department and shall report thereon annually to the
437 Legislature. The report shall include, but not be limited to,
438 suggestions for legislation.
439 (d) The department shall report quarterly to the
440 committee the receipt and disbursement of federal funds for
441 homeland security.
442 (e) The initial meeting of the committee shall jointly
443 be called by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and
444 the President of the Senate. The committee shall organize
445 itself at the first meeting and elect from among its
446 membership a chair and a vice chair. The committee shall hold
447 regular meetings at least quarterly."
448 "§32-3-1
Page 16

"§32-3-1
SB22 Enrolled
449 (a) There is hereby established a committee to be
450 designated the State Safety Coordinating Committee which shall
451 be composed of the Governor as chair, the Director of Public
452 Safety, the Director of the State Department of
453 Transportation, two members of the Senate appointed by the
454 President Pro Tempore of the Senate, two members of the House
455 of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of
456 Representatives, the Attorney General, the Administrator of
457 the state Alcoholic Beverage Control Board, the State
458 Toxicologist, the Chief Justice of the Alabama Supreme Court,
459 and a person appointed by the Governor for a term of four
460 years from the state at-large.
461 (b) The ex officio members shall serve until the
462 expiration of the terms for which they have been elected or
463 during their tenure in the office to which appointed. The
464 appointed legislative members shall serve for the term for
465 which they have been elected, or if reelected to the
466 Legislature for a succeeding term, until a successor is
467 appointed by the appointing officer during the succeeding
468 term.
469 (c) The Governor, Director of Public Safety Secretary
470 of the Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency, Director of
471 Transportation, Attorney General, Administrator of the
472 Alcoholic Beverage Control Board, State Toxicologist, and
473 Chief Justice of the Alabama Supreme Court may each designate
474 a person to serve on the committee in his or her place, which
475 person shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing official.
476 (d) Any person serving on the committee who is not
Page 17

(d) Any person serving on the committee who is not
SB22 Enrolled
477 entitled to per diem allowances and travel expenses as a state
478 employee shall be entitled to the same per diem allowances and
479 travel expenses in the same manner as a state employee.
480 (e) The membership of the board shall be inclusive and
481 reflect the racial, gender, geographic, urban/, rural, and
482 economic diversity of the state, where possible."
483 "§32-6-67
484 (a) There is created a legislative committee to oversee
485 the implementation and administration of this Article 2,
486 except Subdivision 1 of Division 1. The committee shall be
487 composed of three members of the House of Representatives and;
488 a county license plate issuing official, who shall be
489 appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Speaker of the
490 House, and of Representatives; three members of the Senate,
491 who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the
492 President Pro Tempore of the Senate; and a county license
493 plate issuing official, who shall be appointed by and serve at
494 the pleasure of the Presiding Officer of the Senate. The
495 committee shall also be composed of the Secretary of the
496 Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency or his or her designee, a
497 judge of probate who is a licensing plate official appointed
498 by the President of the Probate Judges Association, and a
499 county licensing plate official who shall be appointed by the
500 Alabama Association of Tax Administrators. The Department of
501 Revenue shall designate a representative, the Department of
502 Transportation shall designate a representative, and the
503 Department of Corrections shall designate a representative of
504 Alabama Correctional Industries as nonvoting and advisory
Page 18

Alabama Correctional Industries as nonvoting and advisory
SB22 Enrolled
505 members to the committee. The chair, who shall be selected by
506 the members of the committee from the legislative members on
507 the committee, shall have the authority to may call meetings
508 of the committee when he or she deems it necessary or as
509 otherwise provided in this section.
510 (b) The committee shall:
511 (1) Meet not less than once every six months.;
512 (2) Require that a simple majority of committee voting
513 members be in attendance for conducting whatever business
514 requires committee action.;
515 (3) Establish guidelines for the qualification of
516 organizations which may sponsor a new or continued issuance of
517 a license plate category, or may benefit from that issuance.;
518 and
519 (4) Approve, disapprove, or indefinitely postpone, by a
520 vote of two-thirds of the members present at a committee
521 meeting, a request for a new license plate category.
522 (c) Decisions of the committee concerning approval,
523 disapproval, or indefinite postponement of further action on a
524 proposed distinctive license plate shall be interpreted to be
525 the intent of the entire body of the Legislature, and
526 separate, specific action by the Legislature concerning a
527 distinctive license plate proposal shall not be considered.
528 (d) The committee shall not consider for approval
529 applications from the following types of organizations:
530 (1) Out-of-state colleges and universities except as
531 provided in subsection (e).
532 (2) Private businesses, business organizations, or
Page 19

(2) Private businesses, business organizations, or
SB22 Enrolled
533 commercial entities of any type.
534 (3) Public K-12 schools, private or proprietary
535 two-year colleges, and private or proprietary technical
536 schools, exclusive of the Helping Schools Tag as established
537 in Sections 32-6-300 and 32-6-301.
538 (4) Groups within high schools, junior community
539 colleges, universities, and technical schools, such as band
540 boosters, athletic boosters, and the like, without the express
541 written permission of the high school, junior community
542 college, university, or technical school.
543 (5) Unions.
544 (6) Political organizations.
545 (7) Religious organizations.
546 (8) Groups that promote racial or social disharmony.
547 (9) Public officials.
548 (e) The committee may consider and approve an
549 application for a distinctive license plate for an
550 out-of-state college or university, upon submission of an
551 application pursuant to Section 32-6-64.
552 (f) Upon the request of the chair, the Secretary of the
553 Senate, and the Clerk of the House of Representatives shall
554 provide clerical assistance necessary for the work of the
555 committee.
556 (g) The committee members who are members of the
557 Legislature shall be entitled to, and shall receive, the same
558 daily legislative compensation, expense allowances, per diem,
559 and other compensation which that they receive while in
560 legislative session for each weekday, Monday through Friday,
Page 20

legislative session for each weekday, Monday through Friday,
SB22 Enrolled
561 during any week in which the committee actually meets. The
562 non-legislative nonlegislative members of the committee shall
563 be entitled to, and shall receive, the same per diem and
564 expenses that are paid to state employees."
565 "§36-21-1
566 Any law enforcement officer of the State of Alabama who
567 is sued or prosecuted for any act committed or done within the
568 line and scope of his or her duties and authority will be
569 reimbursed by the state for legal counsel fees paid, the fees
570 of witnesses paid by him or her and costs of court he or she
571 paid out in defending the civil action or prosecution;,
572 provided, that the total amount of such reimbursable expenses
573 shall not exceed $2,000.00 two thousand dollars ($2,000) and
574 provided the committee established by this section approves
575 such claim. The committee shall consist of two members of the
576 House of Representatives named by the Speaker of the House of
577 Representatives, two members of the Senate named by the
578 President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Attorney General
579 of Alabama. The members of the committee shall serve during
580 their tenure in their respective offices without compensation.
581 The acts of any three members shall constitute action by the
582 committee. The committee shall elect a chairman chair from
583 among its number and shall meet on the call of the chairman
584 chair.
585 As used in this section the term "law enforcement
586 officer" means any person employed in the classified civil
587 service of the state whose duties involve police work."
588 "§38-3-1
Page 21

"§38-3-1
SB22 Enrolled
589 (a) There is hereby created the Department of Senior
590 Services of the State of Alabama, which shall be under the
591 direction and control of the Commissioner of the Department of
592 Senior Services.
593 (b) There is created an advisory board of directors
594 that shall consist of 17 members and shall advise the
595 commissioner in the administration of the department. The
596 advisory board shall be composed of two members of the Senate
597 to be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate;
598 two members of the House of Representatives to be appointed by
599 the Speaker of the House of Representatives; the Secretary of
600 the State Department of Labor Workforce or his or her
601 designee, the State Health Officer or his or her designee, and
602 the Commissioner of the State Department of Human Resources or
603 his or her designee, as ex officio members; and 10 members to
604 be appointed by the Governor for terms concurrent with the
605 term of the Governor. Of the members appointed by the
606 Governor, one shall be a representative of business, one shall
607 be a representative of labor, one shall be a representative of
608 the medical profession, three shall be representatives of
609 senior citizen organizations, one shall be a representative of
610 an organization serving individuals with disabilities, and the
611 remaining three shall be responsible residents of the state.
612 Upon reappointment, the membership of the board shall be
613 inclusive and reflect the racial, gender, geographic, urban/,
614 rural, and economic diversity of the state. The name of any
615 designee to the advisory board of directors authorized by this
616 chapter shall be submitted in writing to the Commissioner of
Page 22

chapter shall be submitted in writing to the Commissioner of
SB22 Enrolled
617 the Department of Senior Services."
618 "§41-9-370
619 The Commission on Uniform State Laws is continued in
620 existence as an advisory commission to the Legislature. The
621 commission consists of three members of the bar Alabama State
622 Bar Association appointed by the Governor for a term of four
623 years or until their successors are appointed, a member of the
624 Senate appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, a
625 member of the House of Representatives appointed by the
626 Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Director of the
627 Legislative Services Agency, and the Deputy Director of the
628 Legislative Services Agency, Law Revision Division."
629 "§41-9-371
630 Upon the death, resignation, failure, or refusal to
631 serve of any appointed commissioner, his or her office shall
632 become vacant, and the Governor, President Pro Tempore of the
633 Senate, or the Speaker of the House of Representatives, as the
634 case may be, shall make an appointment to fill the vacancy for
635 the unexpired term of the former appointee."
636 "§41-9-1060
637 (a) The Commission on Girls and Women in the Criminal
638 Justice System is created.
639 (b) The commission shall be composed of all of the
640 following members:
641 (1) Three members of each house, to be appointed by the
642 presiding officer in each house Speaker of the House of
643 Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
644 One member of each house shall be designated the
Page 23

One member of each house shall be designated the
SB22 Enrolled
645 co-chairperson co-chair of the commission.
646 (2) The Director of the Board of Pardons and Paroles or
647 his or her designee.
648 (3) The Commissioner of the Department of Corrections
649 or his or her designee.
650 (4) The Executive Director of the Alabama Department of
651 Youth Services or his or her designee.
652 (5) The Commissioner of the Department of Human
653 Resources or his or her designee.
654 (6) The Commissioner of the Department of Mental Health
655 or his or her designee.
656 (7) The Executive Director of the Alabama Sentencing
657 Commission or his or her designee.
658 (8) The State Health Officer of the Alabama Department
659 of Public Health or his or her designee.
660 (9) The Chancellor of Postsecondary Education the
661 Alabama Community College System or his or her designee.
662 (10) The President of the Alabama Association of
663 Community Corrections or his or her designee.
664 (11) The Deputy Commissioner of the Substance Abuse
665 Division of the Department of Mental Health or his or her
666 designee.
667 (12) The Executive Director of the Association of
668 County Commissions of Alabama or his or her designee.
669 (13) A circuit court judge appointed by the Chief
670 Justice of the Supreme Court of Alabama.
671 (14) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Alabama.
672 (15) A representative from the Alabama Coalition
Page 24

(15) A representative from the Alabama Coalition
SB22 Enrolled
673 Against Domestic Violence.
674 (16) A representative from Aid to Inmate Mothers.
675 (17) A re-entry reentry professional appointed by the
676 Governor.
677 (18) Two members of the Alabama State Bar Association
678 with experience relating to women's legal issues, juvenile
679 justice, or criminal justice appointed by the association
680 president.
681 (19) An attorney specializing in criminal defense,
682 appointed by the Alabama Association of Criminal Defense
683 Lawyers.
684 (20) A district attorney, appointed by the District
685 Attorney's Attorneys Association.
686 (21) A representative of the Alabama Women's Resource
687 Network.
688 (22) An adult recipient or family member of programs/
689 or services of the criminal or juvenile justice system
690 appointed by the chair.
691 (23) The Executive Director of the Alabama Sheriff's
692 Association or his or her designee.
693 (24) The Executive Director of the Fraternal Order of
694 Police or his or her designee.
695 (25) The Chair of the Alabama Juvenile Court Judges
696 Association or his or her designee.
697 (26) The President of the Chief Juvenile Probation
698 Officers Association or his or her designee.
699 (27) The State Superintendent of Education or his or
700 her designee.
Page 25

her designee.
SB22 Enrolled
701 (c) The membership of the commission shall be inclusive
702 and reflect the racial, gender, geographic, urban and, rural,
703 and economic diversity of the state.
704 (d) Citizen members of the commission shall serve at
705 the pleasure of the appointing authority.
706 (e) Initial legislative members of the commission shall
707 be appointed after July 1, 2010. Thereafter, legislative
708 members of the commission shall be appointed by the incoming
709 President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the incoming Speaker
710 of the House of Representatives after the election of such
711 officers for each legislative term. Legislative members shall
712 serve a term concurrent with the legislative term of office.
713 (f) Legislative members of the commission may serve on
714 the commission during the term for which appointed, and if
715 reelected to the same house without break in service to that
716 house, during the succeeding legislative term until a
717 successor on the commission is appointed.
718 (g) Legislative vacancies shall be filled by the
719 appointing authority who appointed the vacating member for the
720 remainder of the vacated term.
721 (h) The commission shall meet for the purpose of
722 organizing and electing such officers as it deems advisable,
723 determining a quorum, adopting procedures for operations, and
724 attending to such other matters as it deems appropriate by
725 August 15, 2010. The date, time, and place of the first
726 meeting shall be determined by the Speaker of the House of
727 Representatives."
728 "§41-15B-4
Page 26

"§41-15B-4
SB22 Enrolled
729 (a) There is created the Permanent Joint Interim
730 Legislative Oversight Committee of the Children First Trust
731 Fund. The committee shall be composed of three members of each
732 house, to be appointed by the presiding officer of each house
733 Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro
734 Tempore of the Senate. The chair and vice chair of the
735 oversight committee shall be elected at the first meeting by
736 the members of the oversight committee. The oversight
737 committee shall meet as it deems necessary and shall study and
738 oversee all facets of the Children First Trust Fund. The
739 committee shall review each monthly report provided by the
740 council, and may make recommendations as it deems appropriate.
741 (b) The oversight committee shall consider recommending
742 to the council a comprehensive plan to establish a grants
743 program to assist parents in placing their children in
744 accredited behavior modification programs.
745 (c) Upon the request of the chair, the Secretary of the
746 Senate and the Clerk of the House of Representatives shall
747 provide the clerical assistance necessary for the work of the
748 oversight committee.
749 (d) The oversight committee shall review each community
750 service grant awarded pursuant to this chapter to determine
751 compliance with this chapter and the guidelines established in
752 Chapter 24, the Community Service Grant Program Act of 1989.
753 (e) Each member of the oversight committee shall be
754 entitled to his or her regular legislative compensation, his
755 or her per diem, and travel expenses for each day he or she
756 attends a meeting of the oversight committee which shall be
Page 27

attends a meeting of the oversight committee which shall be
SB22 Enrolled
757 paid out of any funds appropriated to the use of the
758 Legislature, upon warrants drawn on the state Comptroller upon
759 requisitions signed by the chair of the oversight committee.
760 Notwithstanding the foregoing, no member shall receive
761 additional legislative compensation or per diem when the
762 Legislature is in session or if a member is being paid any
763 other payments on the same dates for attendance of other state
764 business."
765 "§41-18-1
766 Article I. Findings and Purposes.
767 (a) The party states find that the South has a sense of
768 community based on common social, cultural, and economic needs
769 and fostered by a regional tradition. There are vast
770 potentialities for mutual improvement of each state in the
771 region by cooperative planning for the development,
772 conservation, and efficient utilization of human and natural
773 resources in a geographic area large enough to afford a high
774 degree of flexibility in identifying and taking maximum
775 advantage of opportunities for healthy and beneficial growth.
776 The independence of each state and the special needs of
777 subregions are recognized and are to be safeguarded.
778 Accordingly, the cooperation resulting from this agreement is
779 intended to assist the states in meeting their own problems by
780 enhancing their abilities to recognize and analyze regional
781 opportunities and take account of regional influences in
782 planning and implementing their public policies.
783 (b) The purposes of this agreement are to provide:
784 (1) Improved facilities and procedures for study,
Page 28

(1) Improved facilities and procedures for study,
SB22 Enrolled
785 analysis, and planning of governmental policies, programs, and
786 activities of regional significance;
787 (2) Assistance in the prevention of interstate
788 conflicts and the promotion of regional cooperation;
789 (3) Mechanisms for the coordination of state and local
790 interests on a regional basis; and
791 (4) An agency to assist the states in accomplishing the
792 foregoing.
793 Article II. The Board.
794 (a) There is hereby created the southern growth
795 policies board, hereinafter called "the board."
796 (b) The board shall consist of five members from each
797 party state, as follows:
798 (1) The governor,.
799 (2) Two members of the state legislature, one appointed
800 by the presiding officer of each house of the legislature
801 Speaker of the House of Representatives, and one appointed by
802 the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, or in such other
803 manner as the legislature may provide, and.
804 (3) Two residents of the state who shall be appointed
805 by the governor to serve at his or her pleasure.
806 (c) In making appointments pursuant to paragraph
807 subdivision (b)(3), a governor shall, to the greatest extent
808 practicable, select persons who, along with the other members
809 serving pursuant to paragraph subsection (b), will make the
810 state's representation on the board broadly representative of
811 the several socioeconomic elements within his or her state.
812 (d)(1) A governor may be represented by an alternate
Page 29

(d)(1) A governor may be represented by an alternate
SB22 Enrolled
813 with power to act in his or her place and stead, if notice of
814 the designation of such alternate is given to the board in
815 such manner as its bylaws may provide.
816 (2) A legislative member of the board may be
817 represented by an alternate with power to act in his or her
818 place and stead, unless the laws of his or her state prohibit
819 such representation, and if notice of the designation of such
820 alternate is given to the board in such manner as its bylaws
821 may provide. An alternate for a legislative member of the
822 board shall be selected by the member from among the members
823 of the legislative house in which he or she serves.
824 (3) A member of the board serving pursuant to paragraph
825 subdivision (b)(3), of this article may be represented by
826 another resident of his or her state who may participate in
827 his or her place and stead, except that he or she shall not
828 vote;, provided, that notice of the identity and designation
829 of the representative selected by the member is given to the
830 board in such manner as its bylaws may provide.
831 Article III. Powers.
832 (a) The board shall prepare and keep current a
833 statement of regional objectives, including recommended
834 approaches to regional problems. The statement may also
835 identify projects deemed by the board to be of regional
836 significance. The statement shall be available in its initial
837 form two years from the effective date of this agreement and
838 shall be amended or revised no less frequently than once every
839 six years. The statement shall be in such detail as the board
840 may prescribe. Amendments, revisions, supplements, or
Page 30

may prescribe. Amendments, revisions, supplements, or
SB22 Enrolled
841 evaluations may be transmitted at any time. An annual
842 commentary on the statement shall be submitted at a regular
843 time to be determined by the board.
844 (b) In addition to powers conferred on the board
845 elsewhere in this agreement, the board shall have the power to
846 make or commission studies, investigations, and
847 recommendations with respect to:
848 (1) The planning and programming of projects of
849 interstate or regional significance;
850 (2) Planning and scheduling of governmental services
851 and programs which would be of assistance to the orderly
852 growth and prosperity of the region and to the well-being of
853 its population;
854 (3) Effective utilization of such federal assistance as
855 may be available on a regional basis or as may have an
856 interstate or regional impact;
857 (4) Measures for influencing population distribution,
858 land use, development of new communities, and redevelopment of
859 existing ones;
860 (5) Transportation patterns and systems of interstate
861 and regional significance;
862 (6) Improved utilization of human and natural resources
863 for the advancement of the region as a whole; and
864 (7) Any other matters of a planning, data collection,
865 or informational character that the board may determine to be
866 of value to the party states.
867 Article IV. Avoidance of Duplication.
868 (a) To avoid duplication of effort and in the interest
Page 31

(a) To avoid duplication of effort and in the interest
SB22 Enrolled
869 of economy, the board shall make use of existing studies,
870 surveys, plans and data, and other materials in the possession
871 of the governmental agencies of the party states and their
872 respective subdivisions or in the possession of other
873 interstate agencies. Each such agency, within available
874 appropriations and if not expressly prevented or limited by
875 law, is hereby authorized to make such materials available to
876 the board and to otherwise assist it in the performance of its
877 functions. At the request of the board, each such agency is
878 further authorized to provide information regarding plans and
879 programs affecting the region, or any subarea thereof, so that
880 the board may have available to it current information with
881 respect thereto.
882 (b) The board shall use qualified public and private
883 agencies to make investigations and conduct research, but if
884 it is unable to secure the undertaking of such investigations
885 or original research by a qualified public or private agency,
886 it shall have the power to make its own investigations and
887 conduct its own research. The board may make contracts with
888 any public or private agencies or private persons or entities
889 for the undertaking of such investigations or original
890 research within its purview.
891 (c) In general, the policy of paragraph subsection (b)
892 of this article shall apply to the activities of the board
893 relating to its statement of regional objectives, but nothing
894 herein shall be construed to require the board to rely on the
895 services of other persons or agencies in developing the
896 statement of regional objectives or any amendment, supplement,
Page 32

statement of regional objectives or any amendment, supplement,
SB22 Enrolled
897 or revision thereof.
898 Article V. Advisory Committees.
899 The board shall establish a local governments advisory
900 committee. In addition, the board may establish advisory
901 committees representative of subregions of the South, civic
902 and community interests, industry, agriculture, labor, or
903 other categories or any combinations thereof. Unless the laws
904 of a party state contain a contrary requirement, any public
905 official of the party state or a subdivision thereof may serve
906 on an advisory committee established pursuant hereto, and such
907 service may be considered as a duty of his or her regular
908 office or employment.
909 Article VI. Internal Management of the Board.
910 (a) The members of the board shall be entitled to one
911 vote each. No action of the board shall be binding unless
912 taken at a meeting at which a majority of the total number of
913 votes on the board are cast in favor thereof. Action of the
914 board shall be only at a meeting at which a majority of the
915 members or their alternates are present. The board shall meet
916 at least once a year. In its bylaws, and subject to such
917 directions and limitations as may be contained therein, the
918 board may delegate the exercise of any of its powers relating
919 to internal administration and management to an executive
920 committee or the executive director. In no event shall any
921 such delegation include final approval of:
922 (1) A budget or appropriation request,;
923 (2) The statement of regional objectives or any
924 amendment, supplement, or revision thereof,;
Page 33

amendment, supplement, or revision thereof,;
SB22 Enrolled
925 (3) Official comments on or recommendations with
926 respect to projects of interstate or regional significance,;
927 or
928 (4) The annual report.
929 (b) To assist in the expeditious conduct of its
930 business when the full board is not meeting, the board shall
931 elect an executive committee of not to exceed 17 members,
932 including at least one member from each party state. The
933 executive committee, subject to the provisions of this
934 agreement and consistent with the policies of the board, shall
935 be constituted and function as provided in the bylaws of the
936 board. One half One-half of the membership of the executive
937 committee shall consist of governors, and the remainder shall
938 consist of other members of the board, except that at any time
939 when there is an odd number of members on the executive
940 committee the number of governors shall be one less than half
941 of the total membership. The members of the executive
942 committee shall serve for terms of two years, except that
943 members elected to the first executive committee shall be
944 elected as follows: one less than half of the membership for
945 two years and the remainder for one year. The chair,
946 chair-elect, vice-chair vice chair, and treasurer of the board
947 shall be members of the executive committee and, anything in
948 this paragraph subsection to the contrary notwithstanding,
949 shall serve during their continuance in these offices.
950 Vacancies in the executive committee shall not affect its
951 authority to act, but the board at its next regularly ensuing
952 meeting following the occurrence of any vacancy shall fill it
Page 34

meeting following the occurrence of any vacancy shall fill it
SB22 Enrolled
953 for the unexpired term.
954 (c) The board shall have a seal.
955 (d) The board shall elect from among its members a
956 chair, a chair-elect, a vice-chair vice chair, and a
957 treasurer. Elections shall be annual. The chair-elect shall
958 succeed to the office of chair for the year following his
959 service as chair-elect. For purposes of the election and
960 service of officers of the board, the year shall be deemed to
961 commence at the conclusion of the annual meeting of the board
962 and terminate at the conclusion of the next annual meeting
963 thereof. The board shall provide for the appointment of an
964 executive director. Such executive director shall serve at the
965 pleasure of the board and, together with the treasurer and
966 such other personnel as the board may deem appropriate, shall
967 be bonded in such amounts as the board shall determine. The
968 executive director shall be secretary.
969 (e) The executive director, subject to the policy set
970 forth in this agreement and any applicable directions given by
971 the board, may make contracts on behalf of the board.
972 (f) Irrespective of the civil service, personnel, or
973 other merit system laws of any of the party states, the
974 executive director, subject to the approval of the board,
975 shall appoint, remove, or discharge such personnel as may be
976 necessary for the performance of the functions of the board
977 and shall fix the duties and compensation of such personnel.
978 The board in its bylaws shall provide for the personnel
979 policies and programs of the board.
980 (g) The board may borrow, accept, or contract for the
Page 35

(g) The board may borrow, accept, or contract for the
SB22 Enrolled
981 services of personnel from any party jurisdiction, the United
982 States, or any subdivision or agency of the aforementioned
983 governments, or from any agency of two or more of the party
984 jurisdictions or their subdivisions.
985 (h) The board may accept for any of its purposes and
986 functions under this agreement any and all donations and
987 grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services,
988 conditional or otherwise, from any state, the United States,
989 or any other governmental agency or from any person, firm,
990 association, foundation, or corporation, and may receive,
991 utilize, and dispose of the same. Any donation or grant
992 accepted by the board pursuant to this paragraph subsection or
993 services borrowed pursuant to paragraph subsection (g) of this
994 article shall be reported in the annual report of the board.
995 Such report shall include the nature, amount, and conditions
996 if any, of the donation, grant, or services borrowed and the
997 identity of the donor or lender.
998 (i) The board may establish and maintain such
999 facilities as may be necessary for the transacting of its
1000 business. The board may acquire, hold, and convey real and
1001 personal property and any interest therein.
1002 (j) The board shall adopt bylaws for the conduct of its
1003 business and shall have the power to amend and rescind these
1004 bylaws. The board shall publish its bylaws in convenient form
1005 and shall file a copy thereof and a copy of any amendment
1006 thereto with the appropriate agency or officer in each of the
1007 party states.
1008 (k) The board annually shall make to the governor and
Page 36

(k) The board annually shall make to the governor and
SB22 Enrolled
1009 legislature of each party state a report covering the
1010 activities of the board for the preceding year. The board at
1011 any time may make such additional reports and transmit such
1012 studies as it may deem desirable.
1013 (l) The board may do any other or additional things
1014 appropriate to implement powers conferred upon it by this
1015 agreement.
1016 Article VII. Finance.
1017 (a) The board shall advise the governor or designated
1018 officer or officers of each party state of its budget of
1019 estimated expenditures for such period as may be required by
1020 the laws of that party state. Each of the board's budgets of
1021 estimated expenditures shall contain specific recommendations
1022 of the amount or amounts to be appropriated by each of the
1023 party states.
1024 (b) The total amount of appropriation requests under
1025 any budget shall be apportioned among the party states. Such
1026 apportionment shall be in accordance with the following
1027 formula:
1028 (1) One third One-third in equal shares,.
1029 (2) One third One-third in the proportion that the
1030 population of a party state bears to the population of all
1031 party states, and.
1032 (3) One third One-third in the proportion that the per
1033 capita income in a party state bears to the per capita income
1034 in all party states.
1035 In implementing this formula, the board shall employ
1036 the most recent authoritative sources of information and shall
Page 37

the most recent authoritative sources of information and shall
SB22 Enrolled
1037 specify the sources used.
1038 (c) The board shall not pledge the credit of any party
1039 state. The board may meet any of its obligations in whole or
1040 in part with funds available to it pursuant to Article VI (h)
1041 of this agreement, provided that the board takes specific
1042 action setting aside such funds prior to incurring an
1043 obligation to be met in whole or in part in such manner.
1044 Except where the board makes use of funds available to it
1045 pursuant to Article VI (h), or borrows pursuant to this
1046 paragraph subsection, the board shall not incur any obligation
1047 prior to the allotment of funds by the party states adequate
1048 to meet the same. The board may borrow against anticipated
1049 revenues for terms not to exceed two years, but in any such
1050 event the credit pledged shall be that of the board and not of
1051 a party state.
1052 (d) The board shall keep accurate accounts of all
1053 receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of
1054 the board shall be subject to the audit and accounting
1055 procedures established by its bylaws. However, all receipts
1056 and disbursements of funds handled by the board shall be
1057 audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant,
1058 and the report of the audit shall be included in and become
1059 part of the annual report of the board.
1060 (e) The accounts of the board shall be open at any
1061 reasonable time for inspection by duly constituted officers of
1062 the party states and by any persons authorized by the board.
1063 (f) Nothing contained herein shall be construed to
1064 prevent board compliance with laws relating to audit or
Page 38

prevent board compliance with laws relating to audit or
SB22 Enrolled
1065 inspection of accounts by or on behalf of any government
1066 contributing to the support of the board.
1067 Article VIII. Cooperation With the Federal Government
1068 and Other Governmental Entities.
1069 Each party state is hereby authorized to participate in
1070 cooperative or joint planning undertakings with the federal
1071 government, and any appropriate agency or agencies thereof, or
1072 with any interstate agency or agencies. Such participation
1073 shall be at the instance of the governor or in such manner as
1074 state law may provide or authorize. The board may facilitate
1075 the work of state representatives in any joint interstate or
1076 cooperative federal-state undertaking authorized by this
1077 article, and each such state shall keep the board advised of
1078 its activities in respect of such undertakings, to the extent
1079 that they have interstate or regional significance.
1080 Article IX. Subregional Activities.
1081 The board may undertake studies or investigations
1082 centering on the problems of one or more selected subareas
1083 within the region;, provided, that in its judgment such
1084 studies or investigations will have value as demonstrations
1085 for similar or other areas within the region. If a study or
1086 investigation that would be of primary benefit to a given
1087 state, unit of local government, or intrastate or interstate
1088 area is proposed, and if the board finds that it is not
1089 justified in undertaking the work for its regional value as a
1090 demonstration, the board may undertake the study or
1091 investigation as a special project. In any such event, it
1092 shall be a condition precedent that satisfactory financing and
Page 39

shall be a condition precedent that satisfactory financing and
SB22 Enrolled
1093 personnel arrangements be concluded to assure that the party
1094 or parties benefited bear all costs which the board determines
1095 that it would be inequitable for it to assume. Prior to
1096 undertaking any study or investigation pursuant to this
1097 article as a special project, the board shall make reasonable
1098 efforts to secure the undertaking of the work by another
1099 responsible public or private entity in accordance with the
1100 policy set forth in Article IV (b).
1101 Article X. Comprehensive Land Use Planning.
1102 If any two or more contiguous party states desire to
1103 prepare a single or consolidated comprehensive land use plan
1104 or a land use plan for any interstate area lying partly within
1105 each such state, the governors of the states involved may
1106 designate the board as their joint agency for the purpose. The
1107 board shall accept such designation and carry out such
1108 responsibility;, provided, that the states involved make
1109 arrangements satisfactory to the board to reimburse it or
1110 otherwise provide the resources with which the land use plan
1111 is to be prepared. Nothing contained in this article shall be
1112 construed to deny the availability for use in the preparation
1113 of any such plan of data and information already in the
1114 possession of the board or to require payment on account of
1115 the use thereof in addition to payments otherwise required to
1116 be made pursuant to other provisions of this agreement.
1117 Article XI. Compacts and Agencies Unaffected.
1118 Nothing in this agreement shall be construed to:
1119 (1) Affect the powers or jurisdiction of any agency of
1120 a party state or any subdivision thereof;
Page 40

a party state or any subdivision thereof;
SB22 Enrolled
1121 (2) Affect the rights or obligations of any
1122 governmental units, agencies, or officials, or of any private
1123 persons or entities conferred or imposed by any interstate or
1124 interstate-federal compacts to which any one or more states
1125 participating herein are parties; or
1126 (3) Impinge on the jurisdiction of any existing
1127 interstate-federal mechanism for regional planning or
1128 development.
1129 Article XII. Eligible Parties; Entry Into and
1130 Withdrawal.
1131 (a) This agreement shall have as eligible parties the
1132 states of Alabama, Arkansas, Delaware, Florida, Georgia,
1133 Kentucky, Louisiana, Maryland, Mississippi, Missouri, North
1134 Carolina, Oklahoma, South Carolina, Tennessee, Texas,
1135 Virginia, and West Virginia.
1136 (b) Any eligible state may enter into this agreement,
1137 and it shall become binding thereon when it has adopted the
1138 same;, provided, that in order to enter into initial effect,
1139 adoption by at least five states shall be required.
1140 (c) Adoption of the agreement may be either by
1141 enactment thereof or by adherence thereto by the governor;,
1142 provided, that in the absence of enactment, adherence by the
1143 governor shall be sufficient to make his or her state a party
1144 only until December 31, 1977. During any period when a state
1145 is participating in this agreement through gubernatorial
1146 action, the governor may provide to the board an equitable
1147 share of the financial support of the board from any source
1148 available to him or her. Nothing in this paragraph subsection
Page 41

available to him or her. Nothing in this paragraph subsection
SB22 Enrolled
1149 shall be construed to require a governor to take action
1150 contrary to the constitution or laws of his or her state.
1151 (d) Except for a withdrawal effective on December 31,
1152 1977, in accordance with paragraph subsection (c) of this
1153 article, any party state may withdraw from this agreement by
1154 enacting a statute repealing the same, but no such withdrawal
1155 shall take effect until one year after the governor of the
1156 withdrawing state has given notice in writing of the
1157 withdrawal to the governors of all other party states. No
1158 withdrawal shall affect any liability already incurred by or
1159 chargeable to a party state prior to the time of such
1160 withdrawal.
1161 Article XIII. Construction and Severability.
1162 This agreement shall be liberally construed so as to
1163 effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of this
1164 agreement shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause,
1165 sentence, or provision of this agreement is declared to be
1166 contrary to the constitution of any state or of the United
1167 States, or the application thereof to any government, agency,
1168 person, or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the
1169 remainder of this agreement and the applicability thereof to
1170 any government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be
1171 affected thereby. If this agreement shall be held contrary to
1172 the constitution of any state participating therein, the
1173 agreement shall remain in full force and effect as to the
1174 state affected as to all severable matters."
1175 "§41-20-4
1176 (a) A select joint committee, known as the Sunset
Page 42

(a) A select joint committee, known as the Sunset
SB22 Enrolled
1177 Committee, shall be constituted as follows:
1178 (b) Three members of the House of Representatives and
1179 three members of the Senate shall be elected in the same
1180 manner as the elected members of the Legislative Council by
1181 the respective houses: two from the Alabama Senate shall be
1182 appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and two
1183 from the Alabama House of Representatives shall be appointed
1184 by the presiding officer of said elected bodies Speaker of the
1185 House of Representatives; and the President Pro Tempore of the
1186 Senate and the Speaker Pro Tem of the House of
1187 Representatives. The chair shall be elected from among the
1188 members of the committee, alternating annually between a House
1189 of Represenatives member and a Senate member. Any vacancy in
1190 the Sunset Committee shall be filled through appointment by
1191 the presiding officer of Speaker of the House of
1192 Representatives or the President Pro Tempore of the Senate,
1193 depending on the elected body having the vacancy.
1194 (c) Said The select joint committee shall be charged
1195 with the duty of assisting in the implementation of the
1196 procedures of this chapter and shall be charged with the duty
1197 of establishing administrative procedures which shall
1198 facilitate the review and the evaluation procedure as provided
1199 for in this chapter.
1200 (d) The committee shall submit its report and any
1201 accompanying legislation to the offices of the speaker Speaker
1202 of the House of Representatives and the president for
1203 distribution to legislators and the Governor on or before the
1204 first legislative day of the ensuing regular legislative
Page 43

first legislative day of the ensuing regular legislative
SB22 Enrolled
1205 session.
1206 (e) The committee members shall be entitled to their
1207 usual legislative per diem and expenses for attending meetings
1208 of the committee, which shall be paid from funds appropriated
1209 for the payment of the expenses of the Legislature. There
1210 shall be no limitation upon the number of days the committee
1211 or any subcommittee thereof shall meet;, provided, however,
1212 the members shall be entitled to payment only for the days
1213 they are actually engaged in committee business."
1214 "§41-28-6
1215 There is created a Permanent Legislative Oversight
1216 Committee for Information Technology to review the operations
1217 and performance of the Secretary of Information Technology and
1218 to promote the effective use of information technology in
1219 state government. A chair and a vice chair shall be selected
1220 by the membership. The committee shall meet at least once
1221 annually and may meet more often as directed by the chair of
1222 the committee. The membership of the committee shall reflect
1223 the racial, gender geographic, urban/, rural, and ethnic
1224 economic diversity of the state. The committee shall consist
1225 of the following:
1226 (1) The chairs of the House of Representatives and
1227 Senate General and Education appropriations committees.
1228 (2) Two members of the House of Representatives
1229 appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
1230 (3) One member of the Senate appointed by the President
1231 of the Senate.
1232 (4) One member Two members of the Senate appointed by
Page 44

(4) One member Two members of the Senate appointed by
SB22 Enrolled
1233 the President Pro Tempore of the Senate."
1234 "§44-1-51
1235 (a) The Governor shall be the ex officio Chair of the
1236 Youth Services Board.
1237 (b) The board shall be composed of 18 voting members,
1238 five of whom shall be the Commissioner of the State Department
1239 of Human Resources, the State Superintendent of Education, the
1240 Commissioner of Mental Health, the State Health Officer, and
1241 the Director of the Alabama Law Enforcement Planning Agency,
1242 each of whom may delegate his or her vote to an agent or
1243 employee by written notification 10 days prior to a meeting of
1244 the board.
1245 (c) The chair, vice chair, and secretary of the board
1246 shall be elected by the members thereof. The chair shall vote
1247 only in the case of a tie.
1248 (d) The Speaker of the Alabama House of Representatives
1249 shall appoint two members to be selected from the membership
1250 of the House of Representatives and the Presiding Officer
1251 President Pro Tempore of the Alabama Senate shall appoint two
1252 members to be selected from the membership of the Senate. The
1253 President of the Alabama Council of Juvenile Court Judges
1254 shall appoint one member to be selected from the membership of
1255 the council. The Chair of the Alabama Chief Probation Officers
1256 Association shall appoint one member to be selected from the
1257 membership of the association. Commencing April 21, 2006, the
1258 Governor, as vacancies occur, shall appoint the remaining
1259 seven members of the board, as representatives of the public,
1260 one from each of the congressional districts of the state as
Page 45

one from each of the congressional districts of the state as
SB22 Enrolled
1261 such districts exist on January 1, 2006. The membership of the
1262 board shall be inclusive and reflect the racial, gender,
1263 geographic, urban/, rural, and economic diversity of the
1264 state.
1265 (e) The term of each member representative of the
1266 public appointed by the Governor shall be determined by lot at
1267 the first meeting of the board following September 3, 1973.
1268 Two of the public members shall serve five-year terms, two
1269 shall serve two-year terms, and one each shall serve three,
1270 four, and six-year terms, respectively. Thereafter, the terms
1271 of office of the public members shall be six years. The terms
1272 of office of the appointed legislative members shall be for
1273 the duration of their respective elected terms of office to
1274 the Senate or House of Representatives. The term of office of
1275 the member representative of the Alabama Council of Juvenile
1276 Court Judges and the member representative of the Chief
1277 Probation Officers Association shall be six years.
1278 (f) If any appointed legislative member should die,
1279 cease to be a member of the Legislature, or resign from the
1280 board, such vacancy shall be filled by the Speaker of the
1281 House of Representatives or Presiding Officer the President
1282 Pro Tempore of the Senate, with such member to be selected
1283 from the respective legislative body, as applicable. If the
1284 appointed juvenile court judge should die, cease to be a
1285 juvenile court judge, or resign from the board, the President
1286 of the Alabama Council of Juvenile Court Judges shall appoint
1287 a successor for the unexpired term of that member. If the
1288 appointed chief probation officer should die, cease to be a
Page 46

appointed chief probation officer should die, cease to be a
SB22 Enrolled
1289 probation officer, or resign from the board, the Chair of the
1290 Alabama Chief Probation Officers Association shall appoint a
1291 successor for the unexpired term of that member. If a vacancy
1292 occurs in the appointed membership made by the Governor, upon
1293 certification thereof by the board, the Governor shall appoint
1294 a person to fill the vacancy for the unexpired term of the
1295 member. If any person holding any state office named in this
1296 section should cease to hold such office by reason of death,
1297 resignation, expiration of term of office, or for any other
1298 reason, then his or her successor in office shall take his or
1299 her place as a member of the board.
1300 (g) No member of the board shall draw any salary in
1301 addition to that now authorized by law for any service he or
1302 she may render or for any deed he or she may perform in
1303 connection with the board. If not otherwise reimbursed by
1304 public funds for services provided to this board, the member
1305 representative of the Alabama Council of Juvenile Court
1306 Judges, the member representative of the Alabama Chief
1307 Probation Officers Association, and each member representative
1308 of the public shall receive the same mileage and per diem
1309 allowance as paid to state employees while attending meetings
1310 of the board or while engaged in other official duties at the
1311 request of the board. The legislative members shall receive
1312 their regular legislative compensation and mileage when
1313 actively engaged in board business.
1314 (h) All proceedings of the board shall be reduced to
1315 writing by the secretary of the board, shall be signed by at
1316 least six members of the board, and shall be recorded in a
Page 47

least six members of the board, and shall be recorded in a
SB22 Enrolled
1317 substantially bound book and filed in the office of the
1318 secretary, who shall be the custodian of the records of the
1319 board. Copies of the proceedings, when certified by the
1320 secretary of the board, shall be received in all courts as
1321 prima facie evidence of the matters and things therein set
1322 forth."
1323 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1324 1, 2026.
Page 48

1, 2026.
SB22 Enrolled
1325
1326
1327
1328
1329
1330
1331 ________________________________________________
1332 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
1333
1334
1335
1336 ________________________________________________
1337 Speaker of the House of Representatives
1338
1339
1340 SB22
1341 Senate 27-Jan-26
1342 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
1343 the Senate.
1344
1345 Patrick Harris,
1346 Secretary.
1347
1348
1349
1350
1351 House of Representatives
1352 Amended and passed: 17-Mar-26
1353
1354
1355
1356
1357 Senate concurred in House amendment 17-Mar-26
1358
1359
1360
1361
1362 By: Senator Givhan
Page 49